Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.110

Insurance reserve—Funds.

School districts of the first class, when in the judgment of the board of directors it be deemed expedient, shall have power to create and maintain an insurance reserve for said districts, to be used to meet losses specified by the board of directors of the school districts.

Funds required for maintenance of such an insurance reserve shall be budgeted and allowed as are other moneys required for the support of the school district.

[ 1983 c 59 s 16; 1982 c 191 s 12; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.185. Prior: (i) 1911 c 79 s 1; RRS s 4707. Formerly RCW 28.59.010. (ii) 1911 c 79 s 2; RRS s 4708. Formerly RCW 28.59.020. (iii) 1941 c 187 s 1; 1911 c 79 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4709. Formerly RCW 28A.59.185, 28.59.030.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—Severability—1983 c 59: See notes following RCW 28A.505.010.

Severability—1982 c 191: See note following RCW 28A.335.210.